District of Columbia statutes.
29-305.06

Waiver of notice.

(a)

A shareholder may waive any notice required by this chapter, the articles of incorporation, or bylaws before or after the date and time stated in the notice. The waiver shall be in a record, be signed by the shareholder entitled to the notice, and be delivered to the corporation for inclusion in the minutes or filing with the corporate records.

(b)

A shareholder’s attendance at a meeting waives object to:

(1)

Lack of notice or defective notice of the meeting, unless the shareholder, at the beginning of the meeting, objects to holding the meeting or transacting business at the meeting; and

(2)

Consideration of a particular matter at the meeting that is not within the purpose described in the meeting notice, unless the shareholder objects to considering the matter when it is presented.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(c)(9), 59 DCR 13171
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 substituted “in a record” for “in writing” in (a).
Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.